vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Leo núi: Thiết bị hãm; Móc leo núi; Dây leo núi phụ trợ; Trang phục leo núi và phụ kiện; Thiết bị kẹp dây; Phấn leo núi; Túi đựng phấn leo núi; Đệm đỡ dùng cho leo núi; Dây buộc đôi leo núi; Sách hướng dẫn và bản đồ leo núi; Đai bảo hộ leo núi; Balo leo núi; Thiết bị bảo hộ an toàn leo núi; Ròng rọc leo núi; Dây thừng leo núi; Túi đựng dây thừng leo núi; Dây đai leo núi; Dụng cụ leo núi tuyết; Phụ kiện vít bắt băng; Ốc vít leo núi tuyết; Mấu bám leo núi; Móc treo
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Laipiojimas: Saugojimo įrenginiai; Karabinai; Laipiojimo aksesuarų virvelės; Laipiojimo drabužiai ir aksesuarai; Kilimo ir nusileidimo įrenginiai; Laipiojimo kreida; Magnezijos maišeliai; Boulderingo čiužiniai; Dvigubos savisaugos; Laipiojimo gidai ir žemėlapiai; Apraišai; Laipiojimo kuprinės ir krepšiai; Saugos įtaisai; Laipiojimo skriemuliai; Laipiojimo virvės; Laipiojimo virvių krepšiai; Laipiojimo juostos; Ledo laipiojimo įrankiai; Ledo sraigtų priedai; Ledsriegiai; Kybiai; Atotampos
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Klettern: Sicherungsgeräte; Karabiner; Kletter-Reepschnüre; Kletterbekleidung & -zubehör; Steigklemmen & Abseilausrüstung; Kletter-Chalk; Boulder-Chalkbags; Bouldermatten; Kletter-Doppel-Lanyards; Kletterführer & -karten; Klettergurte; Kletterrucksäcke; Kletterschutzausrüstung; Seilrollen zum Klettern; Kletterseile; Seilsäcke; Gurtbänder; Eiskletterausrüstung; Zubehör für Eisschrauben; Eisschrauben; Kletterwandgriffe; Expresssets
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Klatring: Ringbolte; Karabiner; Tilbehørssnore til klatring; Udstyr og tilbehør til klatring; Klatretaljer; Kalk til klatring; Klatrekalkposer; Beskyttelsesudstyr til klatring; Dobbelte klatresnore; Klatreførere og -kort; Klatreseler; Tasker og rygsække til klatring; Klatrebeskyttelse; Taljer til klatring; Klatrereb; Tasker til klatrereb; Nylonsnore til klatring; Isklatringredskaber; Tilbehør til isskruer; Isskruer; Klatregreb til indendørs klatring; Ekspresslynge
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Arrampicata: Dispositivi per assicurazione; Moschettoni; Cordini per arrampicata; Accessori e attrezzature per arrampicata; Discensori e autobloccanti per arrampicata; Magnesite da arrampicata; Sacchetti magnesite da arrampicata; Protezioni antiurto per arrampicata; Cordini doppi da arrampicata; Guide e mappe da arrampicata; Imbraghi da arrampicata; Zaini da arrampicata; Dispositivi di protezione da arrampicata; Carrucole da arrampicata; Fune da arrampicata; Borse funi da arrampicata; Fettuccia da arrampicata; Attrezzi per arrampicata su ghiaccio; Accessori per chiodi da ghiaccio; Viti da ghiaccio; Prese per arrampicata indoor; Rinvii
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > クライミング: 登山用確保器; カラビナ; クライミング用アクセサリーコード; 登山用装備・小物; 登山用アセンダー・ディセンダー; クライミング用チョーク; 登山用チョークバッグ; 登山用クラッシュパッド; 登山用ダブルランヤード; クライミングガイドブック・マップ; 登山用ハーネス; クライミング用バックパック; 登山用安全装置; クライミング用プーリー; 登山用ロープ; 登山用ロープバッグ; 登山用ウェビング; アイスクライミング用品; アイススクリューアクセサリー; アイススクリュー; インドアクライミング用ホールド; クイックドロー
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Αναρρίχηση: Συσκευές ασφάλισης; Καραμπίνερ; Βοηθητικά κορδόνια αναρρίχησης; Ένδυση & αξεσουάρ αναρρίχησης; Αναρριχητικά & καταβατικά μέσα αναρρίχησης; Μαγνησία αναρρίχησης; Τσάντες κιμωλίας αναρρίχησης; Στρώματα ασφαλείας αναρρίχησης; Διπλά λουριά αναρρίχησης; Οδηγοί και χάρτες αναρρίχησης; Ζώνες αναρρίχησης; Σακίδια αναρρίχησης; Συσκευές προστασίας αναρρίχησης; Τροχαλίες αναρρίχησης; Σχοινί αναρρίχησης; Τσάντες σχοινιών αναρρίχησης; Ιμάντες αναρρίχησης; Εργαλεία παγοαναρρίχησης; Αξεσουάρ παγόβιδων; Βίδες πάγου; Χειρολαβές αναρρίχησης εσωτερικού χώρου; Καραμπίνερ γρήγορης σύνδεσης
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Tırmanış: Halat Bağlama Aygıtları; Karabinler; Tırmanış aksesuar ipleri; Tırmanma Kıyafetleri ve Aksesuarları; Tırmanma Yükselticileri ve Alçaltıcıları; Tırmanış magnezyum tozları; Tırmanış Pudra Çantaları; Tırmanış Minderleri; Çift İpli Tırmanma; Tırmanış rehber kitapları ve haritaları; Tırmanma Kemerleri; Tırmanış çantaları ve sırt çantaları; Tırmanış Koruyucu Aygıtları; Tırmanış makaraları; Tırmanma Halatı; Tırmanma Halatı Çantaları; Tırmanma Kayışları; Buz Tırmanışı Aletleri; Buz vidası aksesuarları; Buz Vidaları; Salon Tırmanış Tutacakları; Tırmanma Halatı Klipsleri
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 攀岩用品: 保护栓装置; 钩环; 攀岩辅绳; 攀岩服饰与配件; 攀岩上升器; 攀岩防滑粉; 攀岩防滑粉袋; 攀岩衬垫/抱石垫; 攀岩双挂绳; 攀岩指南与地图; 攀爬安全带; 攀岩包与背包; 攀岩保护装置; 攀岩滑轮; 攀岩绳; 攀岩绳袋/登山绳袋; 攀岩扁带; 攀冰工具; 冰锥配件; 冰螺丝; 室内攀岩把手; 攀岩快挂装备
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Climbing: Belay Devices; Carabiners; Climbing Accessory Cords; Climbing Apparel & Accessories; Climbing Ascenders & Descenders; Climbing Chalk; Climbing Chalk Bags; Climbing Crash Pads; Climbing Double Lanyards; Climbing Guidebooks & Maps; Climbing Harnesses; Climbing Packs & Backpacks; Climbing Protection Devices; Climbing Pulleys; Climbing Rope; Climbing Rope Bags; Climbing Webbing; Ice Climbing Tools; Ice Screw Accessories; Ice Screws; Indoor Climbing Holds; Quickdraws
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Mászás: Mászásbiztosító eszközök; Karabinerek; Hegymászó-segédkötelek; Hegymászó ruházat és kiegészítők; Hegymászó emelők és leereszkedők; Mászó magnézia; Hegymászó krétazsákok; Hegymászó ütközőbetétek; Hegymászó dupla kantár; Mászókalauzok és térképek; Hegymászó hevederek; Mászózsákok és hátizsákok; Hegymászó védőeszközök; Mászócsigák; Hegymászókötél; Hegymászókötél-táskák; Hegymászó hálózás; Jégmászó eszközök; Jégcsavar-kiegészítők; Jégcsavarok; Beltéri hegymászó tartók; Expressz szettek
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lezectví: Slaňovací pomůcky; Karabiny; Pomocné horolezecké šňůry; Horolezecké oblečení a vybavení; Stoupací a slaňovací jištění; Horolezecké magnezium; Pytlíky na lezeckou křídu; Horolezecké chrániče; Dvojitá elastická lana pro lezení; Horolezečtí průvodci a mapy; Lezecké postroje; Horolezecké batohy a kletry; Lezecké ochranné vybavení; Horolezecké kladky; Lezecká lana; Vaky na lezecká lana; Lezecké popruhy; Výbava pro lezení na ledu; Příslušenství k ledovcovým šroubům; Šrouby do ledu; Úchyty pro horolezecké stěny; Expresní smyčky
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Alpinismo: Dispositivos de amarração para alpinismo; Mosquetões para alpinismo; Cordeletes de escalada; Roupas e acessórios para escalada; Ascensores e descensores para alpinismo; Magnésio de escalada; Sacos de giz para alpinismo; Almofadas antichoque para alpinismo; Cordões duplos para escalada; Guias e mapas de escalada; Arnês para alpinismo; Mochilas e bolsas de escalada; Dispositivos de proteção para alpinismo; Polias de escalada; Corda para alpinismo; Sacos de cordas para alpinismo; Cintos para alpinismo; Ferramentas de escalada no gelo; Acessórios para parafusos de gelo; Parafusos de gelo; Agarras de escalada indoor; Extensores para alpinismo
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Escalade: Assureurs; Mousquetons; Cordelettes d'escalade; Équipement et accessoires d'escalade; Bloqueurs et systèmes d'assurage pour l'escalade; Magnésie d’escalade; Sacs à magnésie pour l'escalade; Tapis de réception pour l'escalade; Cordons doubles d'escalade; Topos et cartes d’escalade; Baudriers d'escalade; Sacs d’escalade et sacs à dos; Dispositifs de protection pour l'escalade; Poulies d’escalade; Corde d'escalade; Sacs à cordes d'escalade; Sangles d'escalade; Matériel pour l'escalade glacière; Accessoires de broches à glace; Vis à glace; Prises d'escalade d'intérieur; Dégaines
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Escalada: Asseguradores; Mosquetões; Cordeletes de escalada; Acessórios e vestuário de escalada; Ascensores e descensores para escalada; Magnésio de escalada; Sacos de magnésio para escalada; Proteções de queda para escalada; Cordões duplos de escalada; Guias e mapas de escalada; Arneses de escalada; Mochilas e sacos de escalada; Dispositivos de proteção para escalada; Roldanas de escalada; Corda de escalada; Sacos para corda de escalada; Cintas para escalada; Ferramentas de escalada no gelo; Acessórios para parafusos de gelo; Parafusos para gelo; Presas de escalada em interior; Fitas expresso
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Klimmen: Zekeringshaken; Karabijnhaken; Hulptouwen voor klimmen; Klimkleding en -accessoires; Stijg- en afdaalklemmen voor klimsport; Klimmagnesium; Klimkalktassen; Valmatten voor klimsport; Dubbele klimlanyards; Klimgidsen en -kaarten; Klimharnassen; Klimtassen en -rugzakken; Beschermende apparatuur voor klimmen; Klimkatrollen; Klimtouw; Tassen voor klimtouw; Spanbanden voor klimmen; IJsklimmateriaal; Accessoires voor ijsschroeven; IJsschroeven; Steunen voor indoorklimmen; Klimhaken
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 등반: 확보기구; 카라비너; 클라이밍 액세서리 코드; 등산복/등산용 액세서리; 등반용 등강기/하강기; 클라이밍 초크; 등산용 초크 백; 등반용 충격완화 패드; 등반용 더블 랜야드; 클라이밍 가이드북 및 지도; 등반용 하니스; 클라이밍 배낭 및 백팩; 등산용 보호 장비; 클라이밍 도르래; 등산용 로프; 등산용 로프 가방; 등반 웨빙; 빙벽등반 장비; 아이스 스크류 액세서리; 아이스 스크루; 실내 등반용 홀드; 퀵드로
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Wspinaczka: Przyrządy asekuracyjne; Karabinki; Repsznury wspinaczkowe; Odzież i akcesoria do wspinaczki; Urządzenia zaciskowe; Magnezja wspinaczkowa; Woreczki na magnezję; Ochraniacze dla uprawiających wspinaczkę; Podwójne smycze wspinaczkowe; Przewodniki wspinaczkowe i mapy; Uprzęże wspinaczkowe; Plecaki wspinaczkowe; Ochraniacze wspinaczkowe; Bloczki wspinaczkowe; Liny wspinaczkowe; Torby na liny; Taśmy wspinaczkowe; Sprzęt do wspinaczki lodowej; Akcesoria do śrub lodowych; Śruby lodowe; Chwyty wspinaczkowe; Ekspresy
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Penjanje: Sprave za osiguravanje; Karabineri; Pomoćna užad za penjanje; Odjeća i dodaci za penjanje; Penjači i spuštači; Kreda za penjanje; Torbe za kredu; Podloga za ublaživanje pada; Dvostruke uzice za penjanje; Vodiči i karte za penjanje; Pojasevi za penjanje; Ruksaci za penjanje; Uređaji za zaštitu od penjanja; Kolotur za penjanje; Uže za penjanje; Torbe za uže za penjanje; Mreža za penjanje; Alati za penjanje po ledu; Dodaci za vijke za led; Vijci za penjanje po ledu; Uporišta za penjanje u zatvorenom prostoru; Kopče za penjanje
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Horolezectvo: Istiace zariadenia; Karabíny; Príslušenstvo k lezeckým lanám; Horolezecké oblečenie a doplnky; Horolezecké istiace pomôcky smerom hore a dolu; Horolezecká krieda; Horolezecké vrecká na magnézium; Horolezecké podložky v prípade pádu; Horolezecké dvojité laná; Horolezeckí sprievodcovia a mapy; Horolezecké postroje; Horolezecké vaky a batohy; Horolezecké ochranné pomôcky; Lezecké kladky; Horolezecké lano; Tašky na lezecké laná; Horolezecké popruhy; Náradie na lezenie na ľade; Príslušenstvo k ľadovým skrutkám; Skrutky do ľadu; Interiérové lezecké úchyty; Expresky
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Катерене: Осигурителни устройства; Карабинери; Въжета за аксесоари за катерене; Облекло и аксесоари за алпинизъм; Самохвати и десандьори за катерене; Талк за катерене; Чанти за магнезий; Противоударни подложки за алпинизъм; Двойни въжета за алпинизъм; Пътеводители и карти за катерене; Катерачни седалки; Сакове и раници за катерене; Устройства за защита при алпинизъм; Макари за катерене; Въже за алпинизъм; Чанти за въже за алпинизъм; Ленти за катерене; Инструменти за ледено катерене; Аксесоари за ледокопни винтове; Винтове за лед; Хватки за катерене на закрито; Примки с карабинери
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 攀爬運動: 確保裝置; 勾環; 攀岩輔助繩; 爬山服飾和配件; 攀岩上升器/防墜器; 攀岩碳酸鎂粉; 攀岩用粉筆包; 攀岩防墜保護墊; 攀岩雙掛繩; 攀岩指南與地圖; 攀岩安全吊帶; 攀岩背包; 攀岩護具; 攀岩滑輪; 爬繩; 攀岩繩袋; 攀岩吊繩; 攀冰工具; 冰釘配件; 冰螺絲; 室內攀岩石; 快扣組
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Alpinism: Dispozitive de asigurare; Carabiniere; Cordeline accesorii pentru alpinism; Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii pentru alpinism; Urcători și coborâtori pentru alpinism; Magneziu pentru cățărare; Saci cu cretă pentru alpinism; Panouri din spumă pentru alpinism; Corzi duble pentru alpinism; Ghiduri și hărți de alpinism; Hamuri pentru alpinism; Rucsacuri de alpinism; Dispozitive de protecție pentru alpinism; Scripeți de alpinism; Corzi pentru alpinism; Saci pentru corzi pentru alpinism; Plase pentru alpinism; Accesorii pentru alpinism pe gheață; Accesorii pentru șuruburi de gheață; Șuruburi pentru gheață; Prize pentru alpinism de interior; Bucle quickdraw
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Escalada: Aseguradores; Mosquetones para escalada; Cordinos para escalada; Equipos y accesorios para escalada; Ascensores y descensores para escalada; Magnesio de escalada; Bolsos de magnesio; Colchonetas para escalada; Cordones dobles de escalada; Guías y mapas de escalada; Arneses; Mochilas de escalada; Dispositivos de protección de escalada; Poleas de escalada; Cuerda de escalada; Mochilas para escalada; Cinta tubular; Herramientas para escalada en hielo; Accesorios para tornillos de hielo; Tornillos para hielo; Presas de escalada; Maillones
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Klättring: Firningsutrustning; Karbiner; Repsnören för klättring; Klätterkläder och -utrustning; Repbromsar och firningsåttor; Klätterkrita; Kritpåsar; Boulderingmattor; Dubbla klättringsrep; Guideböcker och kartor för klättring; Klätterselar; Klätterväskor och ryggsäckar; Enheter för klättringsskydd; Block för klättring; Klättringsrep; Klättringsreppåsar; Klättringswebbing; Verktyg för isklättring; Tillbehör för isskruvar; Isskruvar; Grepp för inomhusklättring; Expresslingor
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปีนเขา: อุปกรณ์มัดเชือก; คาราบิเนอร์; เชือกอุปกรณ์ปีนเขา; เสื้อผ้าและอุปกรณ์ปีนเขา; ตัวไต่ขึ้นและลงสำหรับการปีนเขา; ชอล์กปีนหน้าผา; ถุงชอล์กปีนเขา; แผ่นป้องกันตกเขา; สายนิรภัยสำหรับปีนเขาชนิดเส้นคู่; คู่มือและแผนที่ปีนหน้าผา; เข็มขัดนิรภัยสำหรับปีนเขา; กระเป๋าและเป้ปีนหน้าผา; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับปีนเขา; รอกปีนหน้าผา; เชือกปีนเขา; ถุงใส่เชือกปีนเขา; สายรัดปีนเขา; เครื่องมือการปีนน้ำแข็ง; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสกรูน้ำแข็ง; สกรูที่ใช้กับน้ำแข็ง; ที่จับสำหรับปีนผาจำลอง; ควิกดรอว์
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Klatring: Belayenheter; Karabinkroker; Tilbehørssnorer for klatring; Klatreklær og tilbehør; Tauklemmer for opp- og nedstigning; Klatrekalk; Kalkposer for klatring; Krasjputer for klatring; Dobbeltsnorer for klatring; Klatreførere og kart; Klatreseler; Klatresekker og ryggsekker; Beskyttelsesenheter for klatring; Klatretrinser; Klatretau; Vesker til klatretau; Klatrenett; Verktøy for isklatring; Tilbehør til isskruer; Isskruer; Innendørs klatregrep; Kortslynger
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plezanje: Plezalne varovalke; Karabini; Plezalni dodatki Vrvi; Oblačila in dodatki za plezanje; Plezalni dvigovalci in spustniki; Kreda za plezanje; Plezalne vrečke za magnezij; Plezalne blazine za blaženje padcev; Dvojne plezalne zanke; Plezalni vodniki in zemljevidi; Plezalni pasovi; Plezalni nahrbtniki; Varovalna oprema za plezanje; Plezalni škripci; Plezalne vrvi; Torbe za plezalne vrvi; Plezalni trakovi; Orodje za ledno plezanje; Dodatki za ledni vijak; Ledni vijaki; Oprimki za dvoransko plezanje; Varovalni karabini
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Kiipeily: Varmistuslaitteet; Sulkurenkaat; Kiipeilyn tarvikenarut; Kiipeilyvaatteet ja -tarvikkeet; Nousukahvat ja laskeutumislaitteet; Kiipeilymagnesium; Mankkapussit kiipeilyyn; Crash padit kiipeilyyn; Kiipeilyn kaksinkertaiset taljanuorat; Kiipeilyoppaat ja -kartat; Kiipeilyvaljaat; Kiipeilyreput ja -rinkat; Kiipeilyn turvavälineet; Kiipeilytaljat; Kiipeilyköydet; Köysipussit; Nauhalenkit; Jääkiipeilyvälineet; Jääruuvien lisävarusteet; Jääruuvit; Sisäkiipeilyotteet; Jatkot
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Скалолазание: Страховочно-спусковые устройства; Карабины; Репшнуры для альпинизма; Одежда, обувь и аксессуары для скалолазания; Жумары и спусковые устройства; Магнезия для скалолазания; Мешочки для магнезии; Страховочные маты для скалолазания; Двойные стропы самостраховки; Гайдбуки и карты для скалолазания; Страховочные системы; Рюкзаки для альпинизма и скалолазания; Устройства для защиты от падения; Блок-ролики для альпинизма; Альпинистская веревка; Сумки для альпинистской веревки; Альпинистские стропы; Инструменты для ледолазания; Аксессуары для ледобуров; Ледобуры; Зацепы для скалодромов; Оттяжки